src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
!! # Meänkieli twolc file

!! This file documents the [Meänkieli twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-fit/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) (the file governing gradation, gemination, vowel harmony and other morphophonological processes).

!! The first part of the file contains definitions, the second part contains rules.

!! # Declaring the alphabet, sets and definitions

!! ## Alphabet
!! This defines all symbols (letters, archiphonemes, triggers) to be used.

Alphabet


a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z å ä ö æ ø  !!= * @CODE@ = the letters
%^WG:0    !!= * @CODE@ = weak grade
%^E2I:0   !!= * @CODE@ = kiele- > kieli
%^HMETA:0 !!= * @CODE@ = vow metathesis for ill (sauna+haan > saunhaan)
%^HMET2:0 !!= * @CODE@ = vow metathesis for sauhnaan etc (sauna+haan > sauhnaan)
%^AE:0    !!= * @CODE@ = a to e in otta- > otethaan
%^IDEL:0  !!= * @CODE@ = trigger to delete i 
%>        !!= * @CODE@ = suffix boundary
h2:h      !!= * @CODE@ = clitic hAAn 
i2:i      !!= * @CODE@ = plural of nouns
i3:i      !!= * @CODE@ = past tense of verbs
i4:i      !!= * @CODE@ = i in conditional of isi
i5:i      !!= * @CODE@ = superlative i of adjectives
i9:i      !!= * @CODE@ = plural-i of adjectives (kamalissa)
i8:i      !!= * @CODE@ = past tense of verbs that drops in past antaa : anto
p2:p t2:t k2:k    !!= * @CODE@ = always p t k !mettä > mettän etc
t3:t  	  !!≈ * **@CODE@** = t participating in gradation, but not in t:s !t3 not in use?
k4:k      !!≈ * **@CODE@** = k to j in certain words
t4:t      !!= * @CODE@  goes to 0 (ie rt goes to r) in imartelee : imarella
n9:n      !!= * @CODE@ nouns that keep nn; juvanne
%^A2O:0    !!= * @CODE@ = päärynä > päärynöitä 
%^A:ä %^O:ö %^U:y !!= * @CODE@ vowel harmony archiphonemes
%^V:a   %^V:e   %^V:o   %^V:u   %^V:y   %^V:i   %^V:ä   %^V:ö !!= * @CODE@ = for vowel lenghtening
%^N:n !!= * @CODE@ for  participle -nut
'     !!= * @CODE@ 0027 aphstrophe for saa'a
’     !!= * @CODE@ 2019 right single quot mark for saa’a
ˊ     !!= * @CODE@ 02ca letter prime for saaˊa
;

!! ## Sets
!! Here we group the symbols in convenient sets.

Sets

Dummy          = %+ %^WG %^E2I %^HMETA %^HMET2 %^VDEL %^EDEL %^AE %^AO %^¤ %^IDEL %^A2O ; !!= * @CODE@
DummyBorder    = Dummy %> ;                                          !!= * @CODE@
ArchiVowel     = %^A %^O %^U ;                                       !!= * @CODE@ 
SomeVowel      = %^V ;                                               !!= * @CODE@ 
NeutralVowel   = e i               i2 i3 i4 i5 i9 i8 E I ;           !!= * @CODE@ 
FrontVowel     = e i y ä ö         ü  æ  ø     E I Y Ä Ö    Ü Æ Ø  ; !!= * @CODE@ 
BackVowel      =           a o u å                       A O U Å   ; !!= * @CODE@ 
RndVow   =     y   ö   o u å                 Y   Ö   O U Å   ; !!= * @CODE@ 
UnRndVow = e i   ä   a                   E I   Ä   A         ; !!= * @CODE@ 
VowelNotUY     = e i   ä ö a o   å ü  æ  ø     E I   Ä Ö A O Å Ü Æ Ø ; !!= * @CODE@ 
VowNotI      = e   y ä ö a o u å ü  æ  ø     E   Y Ä Ö A O U Å Ü Æ Ø ; !!= * @CODE@ 
VowNotIU     = e   y ä ö a o   å ü  æ  ø     E   Y Ä Ö A O Å Ü Æ Ø ; !!= * @CODE@ 
VowelNotEI     =     y ä ö a o u å ü  æ  ø         Y Ä Ö A O U Ü Ä Ö ; !!= * @CODE@ 
Vow            = FrontVowel BackVowel ArchiVowel SomeVowel ;         !!= * @CODE@ 
ArchiCns       = %^N ;                                               !!= * @CODE@
LNRM           = l n r m ;                                           !!= * @CODE@
SurfaceCns     = b c d đ f g h j k l m n p q r s š t v w x z ;       !!= * @CODE@
Cns            = SurfaceCns ArchiCns p2 t2 t3 t4 k2 k4 ’ ;                !!= * @CODE@ testing with ’ 2019 for saa’a.
Segment        = Vowel Cns ;                                         !!= * @CODE@
NonFront       = BackVowel ArchiVowel ArchiCns SomeVowel Cns NeutralVowel Dummy ;  !!= * @CODE@ 
NonLNR         = b c d đ f g h j k m p q s š t v w x z ;       !!= * @CODE@


!! ## Definitions
!! This defines strings used often in rules.

Definitions

WeakGrade = ([l|n|r]) (%^AE:) %^WG: ; !! `WeakGrade = ([l|n|r]) (%^AE:) %^WG:`


!! # Rules 
!! This chapter gives the rules themselves.

Rules 

!! ## Consonant rules


!! For the gradation rules, each consonant deletion or change is given its own rule. 
!! Thus, both *kk:k* and *k:0* are handled in the same **k:0* rule. This to avoid rule conflicts.
!! The  change rules (*k:g, k:j* etc.) are restricted by context (*k:g* only after *n*, etc.).


!! ### f rules

"f:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
f:0 <=> Vow f _ Vow: [%^HMETA: |%^HMET2:] ;

!!€ soffa^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ sof000>haan
!€ s o f f:0 a:0 ^HMETA:0 > h ^V:a ^V:a n


!! ### j rules
"j:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
j:0 <=> Vow j _ Vow: [%^HMETA: |%^HMET2:] ;
            l _ e: %^E2I:0 ;


!! ### k rules

"k:g"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
k:g <=> Vow n _ Vow: WeakGrade ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ kenkä^WG>n
!!€ kengä0>n
!€ k e n k:g ä ^WG:0 > n

"k:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
k:0 <=> [Vow|l|n|r] k _ Vow:        WeakGrade ; ! Quant Grad
                 o i: _ Vow:        WeakGrade ; ! pojan
                 a i:  _ Vow:        WeakGrade ; ! vaieta
         VowelNotUY   _ Vow:        WeakGrade ; ! maun 
	    [u|y]     _ VowelNotUY: WeakGrade ; ! tuen
          Vow [k|k2:] _ e: (%^WG:)  h     %> e       ; ! kkh > kh ääkkä : ääkhään
          Vow (Cns) [k|k2:] _ Vow: (%^IDEL:) (%>) (Vow:) [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:|h %> e] ; ! kkh > kh ääkkä : ääkhään, kirkko:kirkhoon
          Vow   [l|r] _ [VowelNotEI | a: %^AE:0]  WeakGrade ; !alkaa>aletaan
              Vow h k _ Vow         WeakGrade ;
           Vow  h _ Vow         WeakGrade ; !vehke>vehettä
!          [Vow - e] h _ Vow         WeakGrade ;
!               Vow h _ Vow         WeakGrade ; ! vehe men kehjetä !!

!! **Tests:**

!!€ takki^WG>n
!!€ tak0i0>n
!€ t a k k:0 i ^WG:0 > n

!!€ johke^WG
!!€ joh0e0
!€ j o h k:0 e ^WG:0

!!€ ääkkä^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ ääk000>hään
!€ ä ä k k:0 ä:0 ^HMETA:0 > h ^V:ä ^V:ä n

!!€ vaike^WG>t^A
!!€ vai0e0>ta
!€ v a i k:0 e ^WG:0 > t ^A:a

"k:j"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
k:j <=> Vow [l|r] _ [:i|e]  WeakGrade ;   ! syljen 
        Vow [l|r] _ Vow:0  WeakGrade %> :i ; ! syljin
        ![#|.#.] r e i _ Vow: (%^WG:) %> ; !reikä, reijän FLER!
	! e h _ [e:|i:] ;

"k4:j"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
k4:j <=> Vow _ Vow: %^WG: ;   ! reijän

!! **Tests:**

!!€ sylke^WG>n
!!€ sylje0>n
!€ s y l k:j e ^WG:0 > n

! k e h k:j e ^WG:0 > t ^A:a
! No rule for h k:j e ^WG. k3:j ?

!!€ vehke^WG  
!!€ veh0e0
!€ v e h k:0 e ^WG:0
 ! k:0?
 
"k:v"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
k:v <=> [u|y] _ [y|u] WeakGrade ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ suku^WG>n
!!€ suvu0>n
!€ s u k:v u ^WG:0 > n


!! ### l rules
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
"l:0"
l:0 <=> Vow l _ Vow: [%^HMETA: |%^HMET2:| h %> e ] ; !No dubbel-cons before h
        :Vow (%^WG:) (%>) i2: (%>) l _ [%^A:|e] ; !ämmäkölle>ämmäköile, 
!       :Vow :Vow (%^WG:) %> l _ [%^A:|e] [.#.|#]; ! hopeale
        [#|.#.] (Cns) Vow+ Cns+ Vow+ _ t:l ; !uskaltaa >uskalan 
        Vow Vow _ t:l ; !huolto>huolon


!! ### m rules
"m:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
m:0 <=> Vow m _ Vow: [%^HMETA: |%^HMET2:] ;
        [#|.#.] (Cns) Vow+ Cns+ Vow+ _ p:m ; !two syll + mm >m 
        Vow Vow _ p:m ; 





!! ### n rules
"n:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
n:0 <=> Vow n _ Vow: [%^HMETA: |%^HMET2:] ;
        _ %> n s ; !Poss-suffix ahvensa etc
       [#|.#.] (Cns) Vow+ Cns+ Vow+ _ t:n ; !parantaa+V+Pass+Ind+Prs>paranethaan
       Vow Vow _ t:n ; !luonto>luonon



!! ### p rules

"p:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
p:0 <=> [Vow|l|m|r] p _ Vow: WeakGrade ; ! tärppä : tärpän
                Vow p _ e: (%^WG:) h %> Vow ; !Ortografi pph>ph 
        [Vow|Cns] p _ Vow: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:|h %> e] ;  ! tärppä : tärphään 

!! **Tests:**

!!€ appi^WG
!!€ ap0i0
!€ a p p:0 i ^WG:0

"p:v"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
p:v <=> [Vow|l]   _ Vow:  WeakGrade ;
        Vow r _ Vow WeakGrade ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ papu^WG>n
!!€ pavu0>n
!€ p a p:v u ^WG:0 > n

!!€ varpa^WGs
!!€ varva0s
!€ v a r p:v a ^WG:0 s

"p:m"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
p:m <=> Vow m _ Vow: WeakGrade ;


!! ### r rules
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
"r:0"
r:0 <=>                 Vow r _ Vow: [%^HMETA: |%^HMET2:] ;
! [#|.#.] (Cns) Vow+ Cns+ Vow+ _ t:r :Vow ; !ymmärtää>ymmärän
! [#|.#.] (Cns) Vow Vow _ t:r Vow %^WG:0 ; ! siirtyä > mie siiryn
                      Vow Vow _ t:r :Vow WeakGrade ; !suortu>suorun

!€ y m m ä r t4:0 ä ^WG:0 > n

!! ### s rules
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
"s:0"
s:0 <=> Vow s _ Vow: [%^HMETA: |%^HMET2:] ;


!! ### t rules

"t:j"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
t:j <=> [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:* i _ i     WeakGrade ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:* i _ [o|u] WeakGrade ;

"t4:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** where *t4* is *t* in *rt* that shall not become *rr* 
t4:0 <=> Vow:+ [l|n|r] _ [Vow: - ä:0] WeakGrade ;
         Vow   t       _ Vow:  [%^HMETA: |%^HMET2:] ;

"t4:s"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** where *t4* becomes *s* in *rt* that shall not become *rr* 
t4:s <=> Vow:+ [l|n|r] _ ä: (%^WG:0) %> [i3: | i8:] ; !preteritum ymmärtä>ymmärsi etc

!! **Tests:**
!!€ imart4el^WG>l^A
!!€ imar0el0>la
! i m a r t4:0 e l ^WG:0 > l ^A:a

! conflicts: t: 0/s, l/s, n/s, r/s, 

"t:0"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
t:0 <=>  Vow ([l|n|r]) t _ Vow:+ [%^IDEL:0 %> e %^WG:0 |WeakGrade | (WeakGrade) %^HMET2: |%^HMETA:|h %> e] ; !
  [.#.|#] (Cns) (:Vow) i _ [a:|ä:|i2:] (%^AE:0) WeakGrade [%> |%> [:Vow - :i] | Cns: | .#.] ; ! pitä>piän, piä; haitata
          u              _ Vow       WeakGrade [%> :Vow - :i|(%>) Cns:] ; ! huutaa>huua, (kausi>)kaute>kauessa 
         [a|e|y|ä|ö] h   _ Vow:      WeakGrade [%> |%> [:Vow - :i]|Cns:] (%>) i3: ; ! för att få lähen, lähin 
                  i  h   _ e:      WeakGrade [%> :Vow - :i|Cns:] ;  ! sihata
           [VowNotIU | i e:0] (h)  _ Vow:      WeakGrade (%^IDEL:0) (%>) [%^E2I:0|i2:i|Cns:|#|.#.] ; ! katu : kaun        tieto>tion?
         [ä|e]           _  i        WeakGrade [%> :Vow - :i|Cns:] ;
                       t _ Vow: %^HMETA: %> h [i i|%^V: %^V:|%^V: i] ; 
             Vow [t|t2:] _ e: (%^WG:)  h     %> Vow       ; ! tth > th
             Vow  (Cns)  _ [t|t2:] Vow: [%^HMETA: | %^HMET2:] ; !mettä>methään
         ![u|a] u        _   [a|e]   WeakGrade [%> :Vow - :i|Cns:] ; ! huutaa>huua, (kausi>)kaute>kauessa !ändrar till Vow för att få tauin


!! **Tests:**
!!€ motti^WG
!!€ mot0i0
!€ m o t t:0 i ^WG:0 > n
!!€ tehta^WGs
!!€ teh0a0s
!€ t e h t:0 a ^WG:0 s
!!€ pitä^WGt
!!€ pi0ä0t
!€ p i t:0 ä ^WG:0 t
!!€ tytär^WG
!!€ ty0är0
!€ t y t:0 ä r ^WG:0

"t:s"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
t:s <=> [Vow - i] ([l|n|r]) _ e:0 (WeakGrade) %> [i2:|i3:] ;
        [Vow - i] ([l|n|r]) _ e: %^E2I: .#. ;
! Rest of rule from fkv:
              Vow   n       _        e:0                     %> i2: [.#.|%> Cns] ; ! fkv
              Vow ([n|l|r]) _ (:s)   e:   (%^WG:) %^E2I: ;  ! fkv: *) 
              Vow           _ (:s)   e:0                     %> i2: %> [Cns|%^V:|%^A:] ; ! **)
              Vow [n|l|r]   _        e:0 (%^WG:0)   %^E2I:   %> i2: ; ! hirsiksi, hirsi (pl: gen par) 
              Vow ([n|l|r]) _        e:0 (%^AO:0) [%^HMETA:0| %^HMET2:0] %> h :i ;    ! jok uushiin
          [i|u|y|ö] [e|u|y] _ (:s) Vow:  (%^AO:0) (%^WG:0) %> i3: ;  ! löytää:löysi (ei sousi)  
              Vow  n        _      Vow:0  [Dummy:* - %^WG:0] %> [i3:|i8:] ;! 13/11
              Vow [n|l|r]   _ (:s) Vow:0  (%^WG:0)  (%^AO:0) %> i3: ;
                          i _ k: 0: ä: %> i5:i  ; ! superlatiivi pitkä/pissiin
              ! [a] [i|h] _ (:s) Vow: (%^WG:0)   %> i3: ;  !vahtea>vahtesi, taitaa>taisi
! *) uusine, vesi: vete^E2I:vesi, vete^WG>n:vede0>n, vete^WG>i2>ll^A:vesillä
! **) [vuosiksi, etc.|vuossii(n)|uusia] ! uusine


!! **Tests:**
!!€ hoito^WG>n
!!€ hoijo0>n
!€ h o i t:j o ^WG:0 > n


"t:l"  
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** for lt:ll
t:l <=> Vow:+ l: (%>) _ :Vow WeakGrade ; 
        !Vow:+ l: (%>) _ :Vow WeakGrade [s|%> [\i2:i|\i3:i]|.#.] ; ! kulta : kullan

!! **Tests:**
!!€ kulta^WG>n
!!€ kulla0>n
!€ k u l t:l a ^WG:0 > n
